Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1057
Board; members;
qualifications.

(1) The board shall consist of
ten professional members, one
owner of a tanning facility as defined in section 71-3902, and
two public members appointed pursuant to section 38-158. The professional and public members shall meet the
requirements of sections 38-164 and 38-165,
respectively.

(2) The professional members shall include:

(a) One school owner who is also licensed as either a cosmetologist,
nail technician, or esthetician;

(b) One salon owner who is licensed as a cosmetologist;

(c) Two cosmetologists who are not school owners;

(d) One nail technician who is not a school owner;

(e) One esthetician who is not a school owner;

(f) One electrologist;

(g) One practitioner of body art;

(h) One nail technology instructor or esthetics instructor
who is not a school owner; and

(i) One cosmetology instructor who is not a school owner.

(3) No members of the board who are school owners, salon owners, tanning facility owners, electrologists,
nail technicians, instructors, cosmetologists, or practitioners of body art
may be affiliated with the same establishment.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 35;

Laws 1987, LB 543, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 25;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 15;

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 21;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 18;

Laws 2005, LB 382, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-374;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 319;

Laws 2014, LB132, § 11.